District of Columbia statutes.
9-802

Selection of site.

For the purpose of carrying out this chapter, the Administrator is authorized to acquire, by purchase, lease, condemnation, or otherwise (including transfer with or without compensation from federal agencies or the District of Columbia, or any state or political subdivision thereof), such lands and interests in lands and appurtenances thereto, including avigation easements or airspace rights, as may be necessary or desirable for the construction, maintenance, improvement, operation and protection of the airport; provided, that before making commitments for the acquisition of land, or the transfer of any lands, the Administrator shall consult and advise with the National Capital Planning Commission as to the conformity of the proposed location with the Commission’s comprehensive plan for the National Capital and its environs, and said Commission shall, upon request, submit a report and recommendations thereon within 30 days; provided further, that the choice of site by the Administrator shall be made only after consultation with the governing body in the county in which the airport is to be located, with respect to the suitability of the site to be selected, and its possible impact on the vicinity.

History

Sept. 7, 1950, 64 Stat. 771, ch. 905, § 2
Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 807, Pub. L. 85-726, title XIV, § 1402(g)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1202.
1973 Ed., § 7-1402.